District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.26

Procedure for public and medical assistance application.

Applications for public and medical assistance shall be approved or disapproved by the Mayor with reasonable promptness. Such action shall be taken on applications for public assistance not in excess of 45 days and on applications for medical assistance to people with disabilities not in excess of 60 days from the date the application is received to the date the applicant receives his 1st assistance payment or his Medicaid care or a notice of ineligibility, unless a delay is caused by unusual circumstance beyond the Mayor’s control including those which are:

(1)

Wholly within the applicant’s control;

(2)

Beyond his or her control, such as hospitalization or imprisonment; or

(3)

An administrative or other emergency that could not be reasonably controlled by the agency.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 526, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 13(b), 53 DCR 6198
1981 Ed., § 3-205.26.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “peoples with disabilities” for “the disabled”.